Massachusetts, session 194th, H3275.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of chapter 60A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out in lines 61 through line 63 “The notice issued
pursuant to this section shall bear on its face a statement of the time within which petitions for
abatement of the excise may be filed.” and inserting in place thereof the following sentence:-
The notice issued pursuant to this section shall bear on its face a statement of the time
within which petitions for abatement of the excise may be filed and shall include a detailed
description of each circumstance that may warrant an abatement or exemption under this chapter.
The commissioner shall generate such detailed descriptions and provide them to each local board
of assessors and the registrar of motor vehicles.
of 2

SECTION 2. Chapter 90 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 1I the following section:-
Section 1J. Within 30 days of a motor vehicle being registered to a particular owner for
the first time, the registrar shall provide the owner with a notice that includes the detailed
descriptions of each circumstance that may warrant an abatement or exemption of the motor
vehicle excise tax under chapter 60A as such descriptions are generated by the commissioner of
revenue pursuant to section 2 of said chapter 60A.
SECTION 3. Within 30 days of the effective date of this act, the commissioner of
revenue shall generate and provide to each local board of assessors and the registrar of motor
vehicles a detailed description of each circumstance that may warrant an abatement or exemption
under chapter 60A of the General Laws.
SECTION 4. Sections 1 and 2 shall take effect 120 days after passage of this act.
of 2